Wisconsin, session 2025, AB174.
do enact as follows:AB174,11Section 1. 1.12 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB174,3,621.12 (3) (b) Renewable and nuclear energy resources. It is the goal of the state 3that, to the extent that it is cost-effective and technically feasible, all new installed 4capacity for electric generation in the state be based on renewable energy resources, 5including hydroelectric, wood, wind, solar, refuse, agricultural and biomass energy 6resources, or nuclear energy.AB174,27Section 2. 1.12 (4) (cm) of the statutes is renumbered 1.12 (4) (am).AB174,38Section 3. 1.12 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB174,3,1491.12 (5) (a) In designing all new and replacement energy projects, a state 10agency or local governmental unit shall rely to the greatest extent feasible on 11energy efficiency improvements and renewable or nuclear energy resources, if the 12energy efficiency improvements and renewable or nuclear energy resources are 13cost-effective and technically feasible and do not have unacceptable environmental 14impacts.AB174,415Section 4. 13.94 (1) (q) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab174 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab174 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB174 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB174 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB174: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting